Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 13 Limited Partnerships [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

7-13-1.
Definitions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Certificates of limited partnership” means the certificate referred to in §

7-13-8

and the certificate as amended or restated.

“Contribution” means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a partner contributes to a limited partnership in his or her capacity as a partner.

“Delivering/Delivered” means either physically transferring a paper document to the secretary of state or transferring a document to the secretary of state by electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.

“Event of withdrawal of a general partner” means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner as provided in §

7-13-23

.

“Filing” means delivered to the secretary of state in either paper format or electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed under the laws of any state other than the state of Rhode Island and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“General partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and named in the certificate of limited partnership as a general partner.

“Limited partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and named in the certificate of limited partnership as a limited partner.

“Limited partnership” and “domestic limited partnership” mean a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this state and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“Partner” means a limited or general partner.

“Partnership agreement” means any written or oral agreement of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business. A written partnership agreement or another written agreement or writing:

May provide that a person is admitted as a limited partner of a limited partnership, or becomes an assignee of a partnership interest or other rights or powers of a limited partner to the extent assigned, and becomes bound by the partnership agreement,

If the person (or a representative authorized by the person orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) executes the partnership agreement or any other writing evidencing the intent of the person to become a limited partner or assignee, or

Without execution, if the person (or a representative authorized by the person orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) complies with the conditions for becoming a limited partner or assignee as stated in the partnership agreement or any other writing and requests (orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) that the records of the limited partnership reflect the admission or assignment, and

Shall not be unenforceable by reason of its not having been signed by a person being admitted as a limited partner or becoming an assignee as provided in subdivision (12)(i), or by reason of its having been signed by a representative as provided in this title.

“Partnership interest” means a partner’s share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, limited partnership (domestic or foreign), trust, estate, association, or corporation.

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Signature” or “Signed” or “Executed” means an original signature, facsimile, or an electronically transmitted signature submitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 4.

7-13-1.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-2.
Name. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The name of each limited partnership as presented in its certificate of limited partnership:

Shall contain the words “limited partnership”, or the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP”;

May not contain the name of a limited partner unless:

It is also the name of a general partner or the corporate name of a corporate general partner, or

The business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner;

Shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any corporation, non-business corporation or other association, domestic or foreign limited-liability company, limited partnership organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in this state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

Any domestic or foreign limited partnership formed under the laws of, or registered to do business in this state may transact business in this state under a fictitious name provided that it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this subsection prior to the time it commences to conduct business under the fictitious name.

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the secretary of state, and shall be executed, in the case of a domestic limited partnership, by an authorized person and, in the case of a foreign limited partnership, by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation, and shall state:

The fictitious business name to be used; and

The name of the applicant limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, and the state and date of its formation.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this subsection or upon the dissolution of the domestic limited partnership or the cancellation of registration of the foreign limited partnership.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this subsection shall be filed with the secretary of state, shall be executed in the same manner provided in subdivision (2) and shall state:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed; and

The information presented in subdivision (2)(ii) of subsection (b).

No domestic or foreign limited partnership transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of the state until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

No domestic or foreign limited partnership may be permitted to transact business under a fictitious business name pursuant to this section that is the same as the name of any corporation, non-business corporation or other association, domestic or foreign limited partnership or domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in this state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date or revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2.

7-13-2.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-3.
Reservation of name. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The exclusive right to the use of a name may be reserved by:

Any person intending to organize a limited partnership under this chapter and to adopt that name;

Any domestic limited partnership or any foreign limited partnership registered in this state which, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

Any foreign limited partnership intending to register in this state and adopt that name; and

Any person intending to organize a foreign limited partnership and intending to have it register in this state and adopt that name.

The reservation is made by filing with the secretary of state an application, executed by the applicant, to reserve a specified name. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available for use by a domestic or foreign limited partnership, he or she reserves the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of one hundred and twenty (120) days. Once having reserved a name, that applicant may not again reserve the same name until more than sixty (60) days after the expiration of the last one hundred and twenty-day (120) period for which that applicant reserved that name. The right to the exclusive use of a reserved name may be transferred to any other person by filing in the office of the secretary of state a notice of the transfer, executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-3.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-4.
Specified office and agent. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Each limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this state:

An office, which may but need not be a place of its business in this state, at which is kept the records required by §

7-13-5

to be maintained; and

An agent for service of process on the limited partnership, which agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-4.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-5.
Records to be kept. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Each limited partnership shall keep at the office referred to in §

7-13-4(1)

the following:

A current list of the full name and last known business address of all partners separately identifying in alphabetical order, the general partners and limited partners;

A copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment to it, together with executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed;

Copies of the limited partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three (3) most recent years;

Copies of any then effective written partnership agreements and of any financial statements of the limited partnerships for the three (3) most recent years. Those records are subject to inspection and copying at the reasonable request, and at the expense, of any partner during ordinary business hours;

Unless contained in a written partnership agreement, a writing setting out:

The amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and that each partner has agreed to contribute;

The times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

Any right of a partner to receive distribution, or of a general partner to make distributions to a partner, that include a return of all or any part of the partner’s contribution; and

Any events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-5.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-6.
Nature of business. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-6.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-7.
Business transactions of partner with partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to and transact any other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect to that transaction of business as a person who is not a partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-7.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-8.
Formation — Certificate of limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In order to form a limited partnership, a certificate of limited partnership shall be executed and filed in the office of the secretary of state, stating:

The name of the limited partnership;

The address of the office and the name and address of the agent for service of process required to be maintained by §

7-13-4

;

The name and the business address of each general partner;

A mailing address for the limited partnership;

Any other matters the partners determine to include in the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4.

7-13-8.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-8.1.
Conversion of certain entities to a limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this section, the term “other entity” means a corporation, business trust or association, a real estate investment trust, a common-law trust, or any other unincorporated business or entity including a limited-liability company or a partnership, whether general or limited (including a registered limited-liability partnership).

Any other entity may convert to a domestic limited partnership by complying with subsection (h) of this section and filing in the office of the secretary of state in accordance with §

7-13-13

:

A certificate of conversion to limited partnership that has been executed by one or more authorized persons in accordance with §

7-13-11

; and

A certificate of limited partnership that complies with §

7-13-8

and has been executed by one or more authorized persons in accordance with §

7-13-11

.

The certificate of conversion to a limited partnership shall state:

The date on which and jurisdiction where the other entity was first created, formed, or otherwise came into being and, if it has changed, its jurisdiction immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic limited partnership;

The name and type of the other entity immediately prior to the filing of the certificate of conversion to limited partnership;

The name of the limited partnership as set forth in its certificate of limited partnership filed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section; and

The future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain) of the conversion to a limited partnership if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to limited partnership and the certificate of limited partnership.

Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of the certificate of conversion to limited partnership and the certificate of formation or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to limited partnership and the certificate of limited partnership, the other entity shall be converted into a domestic limited partnership and the limited partnership shall thereafter be subject to all of the provisions of this chapter, except that, notwithstanding §

7-13-8

, the existence of the limited partnership shall be deemed to have commenced on the date the other entity commenced its existence in the jurisdiction in which the other entity was first created, formed, or otherwise came into being.

The conversion of any other entity into a domestic limited partnership shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the other entity incurred prior to its conversion to a domestic limited partnership or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion.

When any conversion becomes effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the other entity that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to the other entity, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the other entity, are vested in the domestic limited partnership and are thereafter the property of the domestic limited partnership as they were of the other entity that has converted, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the other entity shall not revert to such other entity or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter, but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the other entity shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the other entity that has converted are attached to the domestic limited partnership and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if those debts, liabilities, and duties were incurred or contracted by it.

Unless otherwise agreed, or as required under applicable non-Rhode Island law, the converting other entity is not required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and the conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of the other entity and constitutes a continuation of the existence of the converting other entity in the form of a domestic limited partnership.

Prior to filing a certificate of conversion to limited partnership with the office of the secretary of state, the conversion shall be approved in the manner provided for by the document, instrument, agreement, or other writing, as the case may be, governing the internal affairs of the other entity and the conduct of its business or by applicable law, as appropriate, and a partnership agreement shall be approved by the same authorization required to approve the conversion.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the accomplishment of a change in the law governing, or the domicile of, another entity to the state of Rhode Island by any other means provided for in a partnership agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law, including by the amendment of a partnership agreement or other agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 3.

7-13-8.1.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-8.2.
Approval of conversion of a limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited partnership may convert to a corporation, a business trust or association, a real estate investment trust, a common-law trust, or any other unincorporated business or entity including a partnership, whether general or limited (including a registered limited-liability partnership) or a limited-liability company, organized, formed, or created under the laws of the state of Rhode Island, upon the authorization of that conversion in accordance with this section. If the partnership agreement specified the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited partnership, the conversion shall be authorized as specified in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not specify the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited partnership and does not prohibit a conversion of the limited partnership, the conversion shall be authorized in the same manner as is specified in the partnership agreement for authorizing a merger or consolidation that involves the limited partnership as a constituent party to the merger or consolidation. If the partnership agreement does not specify the manner of authorizing a conversion of the limited partnership or a merger or consolidation that involved the limited partnership as a constituent party and does not prohibit a conversion of the limited partnership, the conversion shall be authorized by the approval (1) by all general partners, and (2) by the limited partners or, if there is more than one class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate.

If a limited partnership shall convert in accordance with this section to another entity or business form organized, formed, or created under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the state of Rhode Island or to a Rhode Island unincorporated “other entity”, a certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity shall state:

The name of the limited partnership and, if it has been changed, the name under which its certificate of formation was originally filed;

The date of filing of its original certificate of formation with the secretary of state;

The jurisdiction in which the entity or business form, to which the limited partnership shall be converted, is organized, formed, or created, and the name and type of such entity or business form;

The future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain, of the conversion if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity;

That the conversion has been approved in accordance with this section; and

The agreement of the limited partnership that it may be served with process in the state of Rhode Island in any action, suit, or proceeding for enforcement of any obligation to the limited partnership arising while it was a limited partnership of the state of Rhode Island, and that it irrevocably appoints the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit, or proceeding.

Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of the certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity and upon payment of all fees due by the limited partnership, as evidenced by an appropriate certificate of good standing issued by the Rhode Island division of taxation, the secretary of state shall certify that the limited partnership has filed all documents and paid all fees required by this chapter, and thereupon the limited partnership shall cease to exist as a limited partnership of the state of Rhode Island. Such certificate of the secretary of state shall be prima facie evidence of the conversion by such limited partnership out of the state of Rhode Island.

The conversion of a limited partnership out of the state of Rhode Island in accordance with this section and the resulting cessation of its existence as a limited partnership of the state of Rhode Island pursuant to a certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the limited partnership incurred prior to such conversion or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to such conversion, nor shall it be deemed to affect the choice of laws applicable to the limited partnership with respect to matters arising prior to such conversion.

When a limited partnership has been converted to another entity or business form pursuant to this section, the other entity or business form shall, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, be deemed to be the same entity as the limited partnership. When any conversion shall have become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the limited partnership that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all such debts due to such limited partnership, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to such limited partnership, shall remain vested in the other entity or business form to which such limited partnership has converted and shall be the property of such other entity or business form, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in such limited partnership shall not revert to such limited partnership or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter, but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of such limited partnership shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the limited partnership that has converted shall remain attached to the other entity or business form to which such limited partnership has converted, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if said debts, liabilities, and duties had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as such other entity or business form. The rights, privileges, powers, and interests in property of the limited partnership that has converted, as well as the debts, liabilities and duties of such limited partnership, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the other entity or business form to which such limited partnership has converted for any purpose of the laws of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2.

7-13-8.2.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 94, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 112, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-9.
Amendment to certificate. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment to it in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate shall state:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing the certificate; and

The amendment to the certificate.

Within thirty (30) days after the happening of any of the following events, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed:

The admission of a new general partner;

The withdrawal of a general partner; or

The continuation of the business under §

7-13-44

after an event of withdrawal of a general partner.

A general partner who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the certificate inaccurate in any material respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners determine.

If an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership is filed in compliance with subsection (a) or (b), no person is subject to liability because the amendment was not filed earlier.

A restated certificate of limited partnership may be executed and filed in the same manner as a certificate of amendment.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the certificate of amendment, a certificate of amendment is effective at the time of its filing with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1.

7-13-9.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-10.
Cancellation of certificate. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A certificate of limited partnership is cancelled upon the dissolution and the commencement of winding up of the partnership or at any other time there are no limited partners, or upon the conversion of a limited partnership to a limited-liability company. When all fees and taxes have been paid to the tax administrator, as evidenced by an appropriate certificate of good standing issued by the Rhode Island division of taxation, a certificate of cancellation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and state:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership or certificate of conversion from a limited partnership to a limited-liability company, as the case may be;

The reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

The effective date (which shall be a date certain) of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information the general partners filing the certificate determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2.

7-13-10.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-11.
Execution of certificates. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Each certificate required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner:

An original certificate of limited partnership, a certificate of cancellation, and a certificate of conversion to a limited partnership must be signed by all general partners; and

A certificate of amendment must be signed by at least one general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner.

Any person may sign a certificate by an attorney in fact, but a power of attorney to sign a certificate relating to the admission, of a general partner must specifically describe the admission or increase.

The execution of a certificate by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated in it are true.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3.

7-13-11.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-12.
Amendment or cancellation by judicial act. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If a person required by §

7-13-11

to execute a certificate of amendment or cancellation fails or refuses to do so, any other partner, and any assignee of a partnership interest, who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal, may petition the superior court to direct the amendment or cancellation. If the court finds that the amendment or cancellation is proper and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the secretary of state to record an appropriate certificate of amendment or cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-12.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-13.
Filing in office of secretary of state — Certificate of conversion to a limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The certificate of limited partnership and of any certificates of amendments or cancellation (or of any judicial decree of amendment or cancellation) shall be delivered to the secretary of state. A person who executes a certificate as an agent, attorney in fact, or fiduciary need not exhibit evidence of his or her authority as a prerequisite to filing. Any signature on any certificate authorized to be filed with the secretary of state under any provision of this chapter may be a facsimile. Unless the secretary of state finds that any certificate does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required by law the secretary shall:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed” and the day, month, and year of the filing of it;

File the original in his or her office.

[Deleted by P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8 and P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8.]

Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment (or judicial decree of amendment) in the office of the secretary of state, the certificate of limited partnership or certificate of conversion as the case may be shall be amended as presented in the certificate, and on the effective date of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial decree of cancellation), the certificate of limited partnership or certificate of conversion to a limited partnership is cancelled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8.

7-13-13.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-14.
Liability for false statement in certificate. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If any certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a false statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any person who executes the certificate, or causes another to execute it on his or her behalf, and knew, and any general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false at the time the certificate was executed; and

Any general partner who subsequently knows or should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any respect within a sufficient time before the statement was relied upon reasonably to have enabled that general partner to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under §

7-13-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-14.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-15.
Notice. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated in it as general partners are general partners, but it is not notice of any other fact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.